Wisconsin, session 2025, SB813.
do enact as follows:SB813,11Section 1. 59.43 (1c) (w) of the statutes is created to read:SB813,2,3259.43 (1c) (w) Record and maintain in the index under sub. (9) declarations of 3an ownership interest in parcels that satisfy all of the following:SB813,2,441. The parcel contains a building, improvement, or fixture.SB813,2,552. The parcel consists of no land.SB813,26Section 2. 59.43 (1c) (wc) of the statutes is created to read:SB813,2,8759.43 (1c) (wc) Record and maintain in the index under sub. (9) conveyances 8of an ownership interest in parcels that are described in par. (w).SB813,39Section 3. 70.09 (2) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB813,2,111070.09 (2) (e) To create tax parcels for buildings, improvements, and fixtures as 11described in s. 70.17 (3).SB813,412Section 4. 70.09 (2) (f) of the statutes is created to read:SB813,2,131370.09 (2) (f) To perform duties described in s. 70.23.SB813,514Section 5. 70.09 (2) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB813,3,3170.09 (2) (g) In consultation with the register of deeds, to verify, before 2recording, the accuracy of a declaration of an ownership interest presented for 3recording under s. 59.43 (1c) (w).SB813,64Section 6. 70.17 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,3,15570.17 (1) Real Except as provided in sub. (3), real property shall be entered in 6the name of the land owner, if known to the assessor or real property lister, 7otherwise to the occupant thereof if ascertainable, and otherwise without any 8name. Except for buildings, improvements, and fixtures, real property shall include 9the full legal description of the real property recorded in the office of the register of 10deeds of the county in which the real property is located. The person holding the 11contract or certificate of sale of any real property contracted to be sold by the state, 12but not conveyed, shall be deemed the owner for such purpose. The undivided real 13estate of any deceased person may be entered to the heirs of such person without 14designating them by name. The real estate of an incorporated company shall be 15entered in the same manner as that of an individual.SB813,716Section 7. 70.17 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,4,131770.17 (3) Beginning with the property tax assessments as of January 1, 2024, 18manufactured and mobile homes, not otherwise exempt from taxation under s. 1966.0435 (3), buildings, improvements, and fixtures on leased lands, buildings, 20improvements, and fixtures on exempt lands, buildings, improvements, and 21fixtures on forest croplands, and buildings, improvements, and fixtures on managed 22forest lands shall be assessed as real property. If buildings, improvements, and 23fixtures, but not the underlying land, are leased to a person other than the 24landowner or if the buildings, improvements, and fixtures are owned by a person 1other than the landowner, the assessor may create a separate tax parcel for the 2buildings, improvements, and fixtures shall be created by the assessor or the real 3property lister and, upon recording of a declaration of ownership interest as 4provided in s. 59.43 (1c) (w), the assessor shall assess the buildings, improvements, 5and fixtures as real property to the owner of the buildings, improvements, and 6fixtures. The assessor or real property lister may also create a tax parcel, as 7provided under s. 70.27, for buildings, improvements, and fixtures on exempt lands, 8buildings, improvements, and fixtures on forest croplands, and buildings, 9improvements, and fixtures on managed forest lands and, upon recording of a 10declaration of ownership interest, the assessor shall assess the buildings, 11improvements, and fixtures as real property to the owner of the buildings, 12improvements, and fixtures. For purposes of this subsection, “buildings, 13improvements, and fixtures” does not include any property defined in s. 70.04.SB813,814Section 8. 70.23 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,4,161570.23 (title) Duties of assessors; real property listers; entry of parcels 16on assessment roll.SB813,917Section 9. 70.23 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,4,221870.23 (1) The Subject to sub. (3), the assessor shall enter upon the assessment 19roll opposite to the name of the person to whom assessed, if any, as before provided 20in regular order as to lots and blocks, sections and parts of sections, a correct and 21pertinent description of each parcel of real property in the assessment district and 22the number of acres in each tract containing more than one acre.SB813,1023Section 10. 70.23 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB813,5,2170.23 (1m) Entries required under sub. (1) shall be made based on the latest 2records of the office of the register of deeds.SB813,113Section 11. 70.23 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,5,11470.23 (2) When Subject to sub. (3), when 2 or more lots or tracts owned by the 5same person are considered by the assessor to be so improved or occupied with 6buildings as to be practically incapable of separate valuation, the lots or tracts may 7be entered as one parcel. Whenever Subject to sub. (3), whenever any tract, parcel 8or lot of land has been surveyed and platted and a plat of the platted ground filed or 9recorded according to law, the assessor shall designate the several lots and 10subdivisions of the platted ground as the lots and subdivisions are fixed and 11designated by the plat.SB813,1212Section 12. 70.23 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB813,5,141370.23 (3) The real property lister may perform the duties described in this 14section.SB813,1315Section 13. 74.57 (4) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,5,181674.57 (4) (b) 1. Contain a legal description of each parcel of property. A legal 17description that satisfies the requirements under s. 706.01 is a sufficient 18description for purposes of this subdivision.SB813,1419Section 14. 75.12 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,6,32075.12 (2) Such notice shall state the date of the tax certificate, the description 21of the lands involved, the amount of the delinquency and that such amount will bear 22interest and penalty as provided by law, and shall give notice that after the 23expiration of 3 months from the date of service of such notice the county will apply 24for a tax deed. A description that satisfies the requirements under s. 706.01 is a 1sufficient description for purposes of this subsection. A notice of application for a 2tax deed shall not be served earlier than 88 days prior to the earliest date on which 3the county is entitled to a deed.SB813,154Section 15. 75.521 (3) (am) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,6,11575.521 (3) (am) 1. A brief description sufficient to identify each parcel affected 6by such tax lien. The description shall state the lot, and block and section number, 7if assigned, of any parcel upon any tract, the plat or map of which is recorded and 8filed in the office of the register of deeds of such county. If the lands be unplatted an 9engineer’s metes and bounds description shall be a sufficient description. A 10description that satisfies the requirements under s. 706.01 is a sufficient 11description for purposes of this subdivision.SB813,1612Section 16. 77.21 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,6,151377.21 (1m) “Real estate” includes, but is not limited to, buildings, 14improvements, and fixtures; roots, vines and trees of perennial crops; stock in a 15cooperative building; improvements on leased land; timber; and minerals.SB813,1716Section 17. 706.001 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,6,2017706.001 (1) Subject to the exclusions in sub. (2), this chapter shall govern 18every transaction by which any interest in land or real property described in s. 1970.17 (3), is created, aliened, mortgaged, assigned or may be otherwise affected in 20law or in equity.SB813,1821Section 18. 706.01 (7r) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB813,7,222706.01 (7r) (c) For a parcel that contains a building, improvement, or fixture 23and that consists of no land, by a description of the building, improvement, or 1fixture on a form prescribed by the department of revenue and a legal description of 2the land on which the building, improvement, or fixture is located.SB813,193Section 19. 706.02 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB813,7,44706.02 (1) (b) Identifies the land or real property described in s. 70.17 (3); andSB813,205Section 20. 706.02 (1) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB813,7,86706.02 (1) (bm) If a declaration of ownership has been recorded under s. 59.43 7(1c) (w) or a conveyance has been recorded under s. 59.43 (1c) (wc), identifies the 8building, improvement, or fixture.SB813,219Section 21. Initial applicability.SB813,7,1210(1) Conveyances of buildings, improvements, or fixtures that consist 11of no land. The treatment of ss. 706.001 (1) and 706.02 (1) (b) and (bm) first 12applies to transactions settled on the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb813 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb813 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB813 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB813 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB813: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting